Maine, session 132, LD143.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Fiscal year 2024-25 year-end unappropriated surplus; 6th priority
transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the close of the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025, as the next priority after the transfers authorized pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 1507 and 1511, the transfer of $2,500,000 for the
Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital pursuant to Title 5, section 1536 and the
transfers to the Retiree Health Insurance Internal Service Fund pursuant to Title 5, section
1519 and after all required deductions of appropriations, budgeted financial commitments
and adjustments considered necessary by the State Controller have been made, the State
Controller shall transfer up to $3,000,000 from the available balance of the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Maine
Center for Disease Control and Prevention program, Other Special Revenue Funds account
for statewide family planning services to provide funds to be distributed to a single grantee
that will provide management and oversight of the delivery of family planning services.
Page 1 - 132LR0405(07)